Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2026 Act  shall be known and may be cited  as  “Kristil’s
Law.”
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Communications provider” means:
(A) An Internet service provider, a cellular telephone provider or a Voice over  Internet
Protocol service provider;
(B) A social media platform;
(C) An electronic communication service provider as defined in 50 U.S.C. 1881;
(D) A digital communications company  that provides Internet, cellular, text, electronic
mail, social media services  or any other media that communicates, stores or transmits voice,
data, text, images or video over a distance using electrical, electronic or light wave  trans-
mission media; or
(E) Any other entity that constitutes a telecommunications utility as  defined in ORS
759.005.
(b) “Domestic violence” has the meaning given that term in ORS 135.230.
(c) “Social media platform” has the meaning given that term in 42 U.S.C. 1862w.
(2) This section applies to search warrants:
(a) For which the object of the search is one or  more documents or records or other
information from a communications provider; and
(b) That pertain to an investigation  of a crime constituting domestic violence, stalking
as defined in ORS 163.732 or violating a court’s stalking protective order under ORS 163.750.
(3) A person  making application for a search warrant described in subsection (2) of this
section shall specify in the application that the warrant is subject to the requirements of this
section.
(4) When a search warrant  described in subsection (2) of this section is requested, the
applicant shall include in the proposed warrant:
(a) In both  the title and body of the warrant, the words “Immediate Response
Required”;
(b) A statement that the warrant is subject to this section; and
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-A) Page 1
(c) A statement  that the communications provider must produce the documents, records
or other information specified in the warrant to the applicant:
(A) Within 72 hours of proper service of the  warrant, if the communications provider is
a social media platform; or
(B) Within five business days of proper service of the  warrant, for all other communi-
cations providers.
(5) Notwithstanding ORS 136.583 (3),  a communications provider doing business in this
state shall respond to a search warrant described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Within 72 hours of proper service of the warrant, if the communications provider  is
a social media platform; or
(b) Within five business days of proper service of the warrant, for  all other communi-
cations providers.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 2 of this 2026 Act becomes operative on May 1, 2026.
(2) The Judicial Department and any entity defined  as a communications provider under
section 2 of this 2026  Act may take any action before the operative date specified in sub-
section (1) of this section that is necessary to enable  the department or entity to exercise,
on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the department and entity by section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 17, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-A) Page 2